Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 1 General Provisions
12-2-116. Agreements for private development, construction and operation of facilities — Requirements.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this part, the commissioner of general services, with the approval of the state building commission and subject to the policies and procedures of the commission, may in order to provide utilization of state-owned lands and facilities in the public interest, enter into agreements for the private development, redevelopment, construction and operation of facilities on lands owned by or under the control of the state.

Such agreements may include provisions for the sale, lease or other conveyance of state-owned real property, subject to the approval of the commissioner and the state building commission. The requirements of § 12-2-112 shall not apply to such conveyances.

Any agreements entered into in accordance with this section shall be entered into only after public advertisement and only after proposals have been requested and evaluated pursuant to the policies and procedures of the state building commission.

Any agreements for the sale of state-owned real property entered into under this section shall contain the provision that the state shall have the first right for repurchase of such previously state-owned real property, including all improvements thereof, under any subsequent offer for sale of such real property. The repurchase amount shall be at no more than fair market value as established by appraisal.

Acts 1990, ch. 734, § 2; 2013, ch. 454, § 36.

Cross-References. Plans for armories, acceptance and use of funds, §58-1-508.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. §11-3-112 is not applicable to the proposed transaction, but T.C.A. §12-2-116 is applicable and provides specific and separate authority for the Tennessee Department of General Services to enter into an agreement for the private redevelopment, construction, and operation of the facilities at Fall Creek Falls State Park. OAG 17-16, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 16 (3/2/2017).

12-2-117. Sale or lease of department property — Trust fund.

All property owned or held by mental health facilities and controlled by the department of mental health and substance abuse services which is not in use may be sold or leased in accordance with this part. The procedures for selling or leasing such property shall be those required by law and the state building commission for other state owned real property.

Notwithstanding § 12-2-112(a)(7), the proceeds received from the sale or lease of such land shall be deposited in a special trust fund created by subsection (c).

The interest and principal from such trust shall be used as provided in the general appropriations act for the specific purposes of planning and construction of mental health facilities as well as for the transition of patients from an institutional setting into community programs.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(2), on June 30, 2013, the commissioner of finance and administration shall transfer from the special trust fund to the general fund an amount of $1,923,100 in order to recognize the fiscal year 2011-2012 transition costs related to the closure of Lakeshore mental health institute, which were funded by an appropriation from the special trust fund in chapter 1029, § 38 of the Public Acts of 2012, and, if the 2013 general appropriations bill provides for such additional transfer, an amount not to exceed $2,700,000, relative to an appropriation in the 2013 general appropriations act from the special trust fund for additional transition costs which may be incurred in fiscal years 2012-2013 and 2013-2014. The commissioner of finance and administration shall determine the amount of the additional transfer in accordance with provisions stated in the 2013 general appropriations act.

If the 2014 or future general appropriations acts provide for funding of additional transition costs related to the closure of Lakeshore mental health institute, then the commissioner of finance and administration is authorized to transfer from the special trust fund to the general fund such additional amounts as may be specified in the general appropriations act.

The general assembly expressly declares that the transition costs addressed in subdivisions (b)(3) and (4) may include, without limitation, severance benefits, terminal leave, other pay and benefits costs, build-out costs, transition to community services costs, and other costs of closure of the institute.

There is hereby created within the general fund a special trust fund earmarked for the sole purpose of providing funds to the department for the purposes set forth in subdivision (b)(2).

The department shall not submit a budget that proposes to use funds derived from the sale or lease of property owned or held by the department to supplant its current level of appropriated funding.

All property owned or held by the state developmental centers as defined in § 33-1-101 and controlled by the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities services that is not in use may be sold or leased in accordance with this part. The procedures for selling or leasing such property shall be those required by law and the state building commission for other state-owned real property.

Notwithstanding § 12-2-112(a), the proceeds received from the sale or lease of such land shall be deposited in a special trust fund created by subdivision (e)(4).

The interest and principal from such trust shall be used as provided in the general appropriations act for the specific purposes of planning and developing intellectual disability programs for persons with intellectual disabilities as defined in § 33-1-101, including, but not limited to, the transition of persons from an institutional setting into community services, start-up funding for individuals and agencies, and the purchase of homes.

There is hereby created within the general fund a special trust fund earmarked for the sole purpose of providing funds to the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities for the purposes set forth in subdivision (e)(3).

The department of intellectual and developmental disabilities shall not submit a budget that proposes to use funds derived from the sale or lease of property owned or held by the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities to supplant its current level of appropriated funding.

Acts 1992, ch. 898, §§ 2-5; 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2003, ch. 334, § 1; 2009, ch. 477, § 1; 2010, ch. 1100, §§ 21, 22; 2011, ch. 158, § 7; 2012, ch. 575, § 1; 2013, ch. 454, § 5.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to “mental retardation”, wherever such references appear in titles 33, 39 and 41, to “intellectual disability”, as supplements are issued and volumes are replaced. The terms “intellectual disability” and “intellectual disabilities” were substituted for the term “mental retardation” by the code commission in subdivision (e)(3) to conform to the definition in §33-1-101.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1992, ch. 898, § 6 provided that this section does not apply to any land sale initiated prior to July 1, 1992.

Acts 2009, ch. 477, § 1, directed the code commission to change all references from “division of mental retardation services” to “division of intellectual disabilities services” and to include the changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

12-2-118. Operation of school system or school placed on probation.

Whenever the commissioner of education is authorized by the state board of education to take responsibility for the operation of any local school system or school that has been placed on probation pursuant to title 49, chapter 1, part 6, the commissioner or agents duly appointed by the commissioner to operate such local school system or school shall have all powers authorized by this title and necessary to the operation of such school or local education agency.

Acts 1998, ch. 737, § 3.

12-2-119. Disposition of proceeds from sale and conveyance of surplus real property or improvements managed as state office buildings and support facilities revolving fund property.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, proceeds from the sale and conveyance of surplus real property or improvements managed as state office buildings and support facilities revolving fund property shall be deposited in the state office buildings and support facilities revolving fund, created by §9-4-901, to be used for capital outlay.

Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 9.

12-2-120. Disposition of proceeds from sale and conveyance of surplus real property or improvements used for operation of state prisons.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, proceeds from the sale and conveyance of surplus real property or improvements used for operation of state prisons, if not managed as state office buildings and support facilities revolving fund property, shall be deposited in the Sentencing Act of 1985 reserve, created pursuant to §9-4-210, to be used for purposes authorized by that section.

Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 9.

12-2-121. Disposition of proceeds from the sale and
conveyance of surplus real property or improvements used for state armories or other operations of the department of military.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, proceeds from the sale and conveyance of surplus real property or improvements used for state armories or other operations of the department of military, if not managed as state office buildings and support facilities revolving fund property, shall be deposited in a reserve for military facilities, which hereby is created in the general fund, to be used for capital outlay for replacement facilities of the department and other capital outlay of the department.

Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 9.

12-2-122. Reserve for forestry facilities created.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, proceeds from the sale and conveyance of surplus real property or improvements used for state forestry or other operations of the department of agriculture, if not managed as state office buildings and support facilities revolving fund property, shall be deposited in a reserve for forestry facilities, which hereby is created in the general fund, to be used for capital outlay for replacement facilities of the department and other capital outlay of the department.

Acts 2014, ch. 917, § 4.

12-2-123. Dynamic accessibility symbol.

The commissioner of general services shall promulgate rules for the purpose of designating the symbol of access to be used for buildings owned or operated by this state on signage indicating access for persons with disabilities. The commissioner, in promulgating rules, may collaborate and seek input from state agencies for the purpose of carrying out this section.

The symbol must depict a logo with a dynamic character leaning forward with a sense of movement, be readily identifiable, and be simply designed with no secondary meaning. The symbol must signify equivalent facilitation and accessibility as the previously used international symbol of access. The symbol must be depicted in substantially the following form:

Click to view

The symbol must be accompanied by the adjective “Accessible,” when appropriate for the signage, and must be used to designate every point of access for persons with disabilities for all state buildings, structures, or real property constructed or purchased on or after July 1, 2020. For existing state buildings, structures, and real property, signage indicating access for persons with disabilities must conform to the requirements of this section as the signage is replaced or repaired, or when the area of an existing state building, structure, or real property containing signage is renovated.

Acts 2019, ch. 112, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. 2019, ch. 112, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Dynamic Accessibility Act.”

Acts 2019, ch. 112, § 8 provided that a state governmental entity that receives documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of the act may jeopardize federal funding or grant money for the state governmental entity is not required to comply with such provision; provided, that the state governmental entity shall comply with each provision of the act that does not jeopardize such federal funding or grant money.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 112, 9. July 1, 2020; provided that for the purposes of promulgating rules and carrying out any administrative duties necessary to effectuate the provisions and intent of this act, the act took effect April 9, 2019.